Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB54.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "substantially burden" in section 3 of the act of December 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, No.214), known as the Religious Freedom Protection Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adverse action." The application of a civil or criminal penalty or the imposition of an administrative sanction.* * *"Substantially burden." An agency action which does any of 1234567891011121314151617181920 the following:(1) Significantly constrains or inhibits conduct or expression mandated by a person's sincerely held religious beliefs.(2) Significantly curtails a person's ability to express adherence to the person's religious faith.(3) Denies a person a reasonable opportunity to engage in activities which are fundamental to the person's religion.(4) Compels conduct or expression which violates a specific tenet of a person's religious faith.(5) Prevents a person from physically assembling or gathering in order to engage in the free exercise of religion, including preventing a person from traveling for the purpose of physically assembling or gathering in order to engage in the free exercise of religion.(6) Authorizes any adverse action against a person for the person's free exercise of religion.Section 2. Section 4 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 4. Free exercise of religion protected.* * *(c) Limitation on exception.--An agency may not use an order issued in accordance with the authority granted under section 20 of Article IV of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to general authority of Governor) or a control measure taken under the act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955, for the purposes of an exception under subsection (b).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0054PN0044 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829